Utah statutes.
77-20-8.   Grounds for detaining or releasing defendant on conviction and
prior to sentence.
(1)  Upon conviction, by plea or trial, the court shall order that the
convicted defendant who is waiting imposition or execution of sentence be
detained, unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence presented by
the defendant that the defendant is not likely to flee the jurisdiction of the
court, and will not pose a danger to the physical, psychological, or financial
and economic safety or well-being of any other person or the community if
released.
(2)  If the court finds the defendant does not need to be detained, the court
shall order the release of the defendant on suitable conditions, which may
include the conditions under Subsection 77-20-10(2).
